Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
419

CORPORATIONS
SOLE FOR ECCLESIASTICAL PURPOSES

Section

419-1 Formation of corporation sole for
ecclesiastical

purposes

419-2 Articles of incorporation; contents

419-3 Powers of corporation sole

419-4 Amendment of articles

419-5 Name of incumbent; change in incumbency

419-6 Distribution of assets; inspection of
books

419-7 Duration

419-8 Dissolution

419-9 Corporations sole heretofore formed;
general laws

Cross References

Uniform prudent management of institutional funds act, see
chapter 517E.

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next